src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-A-I-okskasi_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - okska'si - ok : # -m animate intransitive verb, run AEW NA1
     PS/aka+PS/sistsik+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: akaisistsikokska'siwa
     PS/ikipp+PS/miistap+okska'si+VAI+Imp+2Sg: kippiistapokska'sit
     PS/iitsiksist+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: iitsiksistokska'siwa
     PS/yaak+PS/isttani+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aaksisttaniokska'siwa
     PS/yaak+PS/poohsap+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aaksipoohsapokska'siwa
     PS/yaak+PS/ipiihk+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aaksipiihkokska'siwa
     PS/yaak+PS/ikkam+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aaksikkamokska'siwa
     okska'si+VAI+Cnj+3Pl: otokska'ssi
     PS/ii+PS/miistap+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: iiyiistapokska'siwa
     PS/isttani+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: isttaniokska'siwa
     PS/isttani+okska'si+VAI+Imp+2Sg: isttaniokska'sit
     PS/ii+PS/misam+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: iisamokska'siwa
     PS/it+PS/iksist+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: itsiksistokska'siwa
     PS/ohsohkat+okska'si+VAI+Ind+1Sg: nitohsohkatokska'si
     PS/yaak+okska'si+VAI+Ind+3Sg: aakokska'siwa
     PS/a+okska'si+VAI+Der/Caus2+VTA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO: nitaokska'sipiooka
